Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4781.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 4. (1) A court, in rendering a judgment in an action brought pursuant to under this act, shall order, as the court considers determines appropriate, reinstatement any of the following remedies: (a) Reinstatement of the employee. , the payment (b) Payment of 3 times the amount of back wages , full owed to the employee. (c) Full reinstatement of fringe benefits and seniority rights. , actual (d) Actual damages. , or any (e) Any combination of these the remedies provided under this subsection. (2) A court, in rendering a judgment in an action brought under this act, may also award the a complainant all or a portion of the costs of litigation, including reasonable attorney fees and witness fees, if the court determines that the award is appropriate. Sec. 5. (1) A person who that violates this act shall be liable for is subject to a civil fine of not more than $500.00.$2,000.00. (2) A civil fine which is ordered pursuant to collected under this act shall must be submitted to the state treasurer for deposit deposited in the general fund.